Illinois, session 104th, SB1762.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic 7Opportunity for the purpose of awarding grants to units of 8local government for the demolition or repair of commercial 9buildings that are detrimental to public health or safety as a 10result of one or more of the following: dilapidation; 11obsolescence; deterioration; or the failure of the building to 12meet minimum building code standards. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.